src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2304 N 1
SFX 2304 ś dniesz .
SFX 2305 N 1
SFX 2305 ś dnie .
SFX 2306 N 1
SFX 2306 ś dnijcie .
SFX 2307 N 1
SFX 2307 ś dnijmy .
SFX 2308 N 1
SFX 2308 ś dnij .
SFX 2309 N 1
SFX 2309 ś dniynci .
SFX 2310 N 1
SFX 2310 ś dniyntego .
SFX 2311 N 1
SFX 2311 ś dniynte .
SFX 2312 N 1
SFX 2312 ś dniynto .
SFX 2313 N 1
SFX 2313 ś dniyntōm .
SFX 2314 N 1
SFX 2314 ś dniyntych .
SFX 2315 N 1
SFX 2315 ś dniyntyj .
SFX 2316 N 1
SFX 2316 ś dniyntymi .
SFX 2317 N 1
SFX 2317 ś dniyntymu .
SFX 2318 N 1
SFX 2318 ś dniyntym .
SFX 2319 N 1
SFX 2319 ś dniynty .
SFX 2320 N 1
SFX 2320 ś dniyńciach .
SFX 2321 N 1
SFX 2321 ś dniyńciami .
SFX 2322 N 1
SFX 2322 ś dniyńcia .
SFX 2323 N 1
SFX 2323 ś dniyńcie .
SFX 2324 N 1
SFX 2324 ś dniyńcio .
SFX 2325 N 1
SFX 2325 ś dniyńciōm .
SFX 2326 N 1
SFX 2326 ś dniyńciu .
SFX 2327 N 1
SFX 2327 ś dniyńciym .
SFX 2328 N 1
SFX 2328 ś dniyńć .
SFX 2329 N 1
SFX 2329 ś dnōm .
SFX 2330 N 1
SFX 2330 ś dnymy .
SFX 2331 N 1
SFX 2331 aś odłech .
SFX 2332 N 1
SFX 2332 aś od .
SFX 2333 N 1
SFX 2333 ieć cie .
SFX 2334 N 1
SFX 2334 ieć my .
SFX 2335 N 1
SFX 2335 ieć 0 .
SFX 2336 N 1
SFX 2336 edzieć owiycie .
SFX 2337 N 1
SFX 2337 edzieć owiydzcie .
SFX 2338 N 1
SFX 2338 edzieć owiydzmy .
SFX 2339 N 1
SFX 2339 edzieć owiydz .
SFX 2340 N 1
SFX 2340 edzieć owiym .
SFX 2341 N 1
SFX 2341 edzieć owiymy .
SFX 2342 N 1
SFX 2342 edzieć owiysz .
SFX 2343 N 1
SFX 2343 edzieć owiy .
SFX 2344 N 1
SFX 2344 nōńć ńcie .
SFX 2345 N 1
SFX 2345 nōńć ńmy .
SFX 2346 N 1
SFX 2346 nōńć ń .
SFX 2347 N 1
SFX 2347 ieć ōnego .
SFX 2348 N 1
SFX 2348 ieć ōne .
SFX 2349 N 1
SFX 2349 ieć ōno .
SFX 2350 N 1
SFX 2350 ieć ōnōm .
SFX 2351 N 1
SFX 2351 ieć ōnych .
SFX 2352 N 1
SFX 2352 ieć ōnyj .
SFX 2353 N 1
SFX 2353 ieć ōnymi .
SFX 2354 N 1
SFX 2354 ieć ōnymu .
SFX 2355 N 1
SFX 2355 ieć ōnym .
SFX 2356 N 1
SFX 2356 ieć ōny .
SFX 2357 N 1
SFX 2357 ieć yni .
SFX 2358 N 1
SFX 2358 edzieć ycie .
SFX 2359 N 1
SFX 2359 edzieć ydzcie .
SFX 2360 N 1
SFX 2360 edzieć ydzmy .
SFX 2361 N 1
SFX 2361 edzieć ydz .
SFX 2362 N 1
SFX 2362 edzieć ym .
SFX 2363 N 1
SFX 2363 edzieć ymy .
SFX 2364 N 1
SFX 2364 edzieć ysz .
SFX 2365 N 1
SFX 2365 edzieć y .
SFX 2366 N 1
SFX 2366 obić ōbcie .
SFX 2367 N 1
SFX 2367 obić ōbmy .
SFX 2368 N 1
SFX 2368 obić ōb .
SFX 2369 N 1
SFX 2369 ōść eślibymy .
SFX 2370 N 1
SFX 2370 ōść eślibyście .
SFX 2371 N 1
SFX 2371 ōść eśliby .
SFX 2372 N 1
SFX 2372 ōść eślichmy .
SFX 2373 N 1
SFX 2373 ōść eślimy .
SFX 2374 N 1
SFX 2374 ōść eśliście .
SFX 2375 N 1
SFX 2375 ōść eśli .
SFX 2376 N 1
SFX 2376 ōść osłabych .
SFX 2377 N 1
SFX 2377 ōść osłabyś .
SFX 2378 N 1
SFX 2378 ōść osłaby .
SFX 2379 N 1
SFX 2379 ōść osłach .
SFX 2380 N 1
SFX 2380 ōść osła .
SFX 2381 N 1
SFX 2381 ōść osłech .
SFX 2382 N 1
SFX 2382 ōść osłoby .
SFX 2383 N 1
SFX 2383 ōść osło .
SFX 2384 N 1
SFX 2384 ōść osłybymy .
SFX 2385 N 1
SFX 2385 ōść osłybyście .
SFX 2386 N 1
SFX 2386 ōść osłyby .
SFX 2387 N 1
SFX 2387 ōść osłychmy .
SFX 2388 N 1
SFX 2388 ōść osłymy .
SFX 2389 N 1
SFX 2389 ōść osłyście .
SFX 2390 N 1
SFX 2390 ōść osły .
SFX 2391 N 1
SFX 2391 ōść osna .
SFX 2392 N 1
SFX 2392 ōść osnōm .
SFX 2393 N 1
SFX 2393 ōść osnymy .
SFX 2394 N 1
SFX 2394 ōść ośniecie .
SFX 2395 N 1
SFX 2395 ōść ośniesz .
SFX 2396 N 1
SFX 2396 ōść ośnie .
SFX 2397 N 1
SFX 2397 ōść ośnijcie .
SFX 2398 N 1
SFX 2398 ōść ośnijmy .
SFX 2399 N 1
SFX 2399 ōść ośnij .
SFX 2400 N 1
SFX 2400 ōść ośniynci .
SFX 2401 N 1
SFX 2401 ōść ośniyntego .
SFX 2402 N 1
SFX 2402 ōść ośniynte .
SFX 2403 N 1
SFX 2403 ōść ośniynto .
SFX 2404 N 1
SFX 2404 ōść ośniyntōm .
SFX 2405 N 1
SFX 2405 ōść ośniyntych .
SFX 2406 N 1
SFX 2406 ōść ośniyntyj .
SFX 2407 N 1
SFX 2407 ōść ośniyntymi .
SFX 2408 N 1
SFX 2408 ōść ośniyntymu .
SFX 2409 N 1
SFX 2409 ōść ośniyntym .
SFX 2410 N 1
SFX 2410 ōść ośniynty .
SFX 2411 N 1
SFX 2411 ōś eślichmy .
SFX 2412 N 1
SFX 2412 ōś eśliście .
SFX 2413 N 1
SFX 2413 ōś eśli .
SFX 2414 N 1
SFX 2414 ōś osłach .
SFX 2415 N 1
SFX 2415 ōś osła .
SFX 2416 N 1
SFX 2416 ōś osłech .
SFX 2417 N 1
SFX 2417 ōś osło .
SFX 2418 N 1
SFX 2418 ōś osłychmy .
SFX 2419 N 1
SFX 2419 ōś osłyście .
SFX 2420 N 1
SFX 2420 ōś osły .
SFX 2421 N 1
SFX 2421 ōś osna .
SFX 2422 N 1
SFX 2422 ōś osnōm .
SFX 2423 N 1
SFX 2423 ōś osnymy .
SFX 2424 N 1
SFX 2424 ōś ośniecie .
SFX 2425 N 1
SFX 2425 ōś ośniesz .
SFX 2426 N 1
SFX 2426 ōś ośnie .
SFX 2427 N 1
SFX 2427 ōś ośnijcie .
SFX 2428 N 1
SFX 2428 ōś ośnijmy .
SFX 2429 N 1
SFX 2429 ōś ośnij .
SFX 2430 N 1
SFX 2430 ōś ośniynci .
SFX 2431 N 1
SFX 2431 ōś ośniyntego .
SFX 2432 N 1
SFX 2432 ōś ośniynte .
SFX 2433 N 1
SFX 2433 ōś ośniynto .
SFX 2434 N 1
SFX 2434 ōś ośniyntōm .
SFX 2435 N 1
SFX 2435 ōś ośniyntych .
SFX 2436 N 1
SFX 2436 ōś ośniyntyj .
SFX 2437 N 1
SFX 2437 ōś ośniyntymi .
SFX 2438 N 1
SFX 2438 ōś ośniyntymu .
SFX 2439 N 1
SFX 2439 ōś ośniyntym .
SFX 2440 N 1
SFX 2440 ōś ośniynty .
SFX 2441 N 1
SFX 2441 ać ijcie .
SFX 2442 N 1
SFX 2442 ać ijmy .
SFX 2443 N 1
SFX 2443 ać ij .
SFX 2444 N 1
SFX 2444 e ōw .
SFX 2445 N 1
SFX 2445 ednōńć adłabych .
SFX 2446 N 1
SFX 2446 ednōńć adłabyś .
SFX 2447 N 1
SFX 2447 ednōńć adłaby .
SFX 2448 N 1
SFX 2448 ednōńć adłach .
SFX 2449 N 1
SFX 2449 ednōńć adłaś .
SFX 2450 N 1
SFX 2450 ednōńć adła .
SFX 2451 N 1
SFX 2451 ednōńć adłoby .
SFX 2452 N 1
SFX 2452 ednōńć adło .
SFX 2453 N 1
SFX 2453 ednōńć adłybymy .
SFX 2454 N 1
SFX 2454 ednōńć adłybyście .
SFX 2455 N 1
SFX 2455 ednōńć adłyby .
SFX 2456 N 1
SFX 2456 ednōńć adłychmy .
SFX 2457 N 1
SFX 2457 ednōńć adłymy .
SFX 2458 N 1
SFX 2458 ednōńć adłyście .
SFX 2459 N 1
SFX 2459 ednōńć adły .
SFX 2460 N 1
SFX 2460 ōńć yć .
SFX 2461 N 1
SFX 2461 ednōńć odłbych .
SFX 2462 N 1
SFX 2462 ednōńć odłbyś .
SFX 2463 N 1
SFX 2463 ednōńć odłby .
SFX 2464 N 1
SFX 2464 ednōńć odłech .
SFX 2465 N 1
SFX 2465 ednōńć odłeś .
SFX 2466 N 1
SFX 2466 ednōńć od .
SFX 2467 N 1
SFX 2467 słać śla .
SFX 2468 N 1
SFX 2468 słać ślecie .
SFX 2469 N 1
SFX 2469 słać ślesz .
SFX 2470 N 1
SFX 2470 słać śle .
SFX 2471 N 1
SFX 2471 słać ślijcie .
SFX 2472 N 1
SFX 2472 słać ślijmy .
SFX 2473 N 1
SFX 2473 słać ślij .
SFX 2474 N 1
SFX 2474 słać ślōm .
SFX 2475 N 1
SFX 2475 słać ślymy .
SFX 2476 N 1
SFX 2476 spać śpia .
SFX 2477 N 1
SFX 2477 spać śpicie .
SFX 2478 N 1
SFX 2478 spać śpijcie .
SFX 2479 N 1
SFX 2479 spać śpijmy .
SFX 2480 N 1
SFX 2480 spać śpij .
SFX 2481 N 1
SFX 2481 spać śpiōm .
SFX 2482 N 1
SFX 2482 spać śpisz .
SFX 2483 N 1
SFX 2483 spać śpi .
SFX 2484 N 1
SFX 2484 spać śpiymy .
SFX 2485 N 1
SFX 2485 ć na .
SFX 2486 N 1
SFX 2486 ć nymy .
SFX 2487 N 1
SFX 2487 ać ōńcie .
SFX 2488 N 1
SFX 2488 ać ōńmy .
SFX 2489 N 1
SFX 2489 ać ōń .
SFX 2490 N 1
SFX 2490 o j .
SFX 2491 Y 1
SFX 2491 o j .
PFX 2491 Y 1
PFX 2491 0 noj .
SFX 2492 N 1
SFX 2492 ć jym .
SFX 2493 N 1
SFX 2493 oć ōńcie .
SFX 2494 N 1
SFX 2494 oć ōńmy .
SFX 2495 N 1
SFX 2495 rzeć arciach .
SFX 2496 N 1
SFX 2496 rzeć arciami .
SFX 2497 N 1
SFX 2497 rzeć arcia .
SFX 2498 N 1
SFX 2498 rzeć arcie .
SFX 2499 N 1
SFX 2499 rzeć arcio .
SFX 2500 N 1
SFX 2500 rzeć arciōm .
SFX 2501 N 1
SFX 2501 rzeć arciu .
SFX 2502 N 1
SFX 2502 rzeć arci .
SFX 2503 N 1
SFX 2503 rzeć arciym .
SFX 2504 N 1
SFX 2504 rzeć arć .
SFX 2505 N 1
SFX 2505 rzeć arlichmy .
SFX 2506 N 1
SFX 2506 rzeć arliście .
SFX 2507 N 1
SFX 2507 rzeć arli .
SFX 2508 N 1
SFX 2508 rzeć arłach .
SFX 2509 N 1
SFX 2509 rzeć arłaś .
SFX 2510 N 1
SFX 2510 rzeć arła .
SFX 2511 N 1
SFX 2511 rzeć arłech .
SFX 2512 N 1
SFX 2512 rzeć arłeś .
SFX 2513 N 1
SFX 2513 rzeć arło .
SFX 2514 N 1
SFX 2514 rzeć arłychmy .
SFX 2515 N 1
SFX 2515 rzeć arłyście .
SFX 2516 N 1
SFX 2516 rzeć arły .
SFX 2517 N 1
SFX 2517 rzeć artego .
SFX 2518 N 1
SFX 2518 rzeć arte .
SFX 2519 N 1
SFX 2519 rzeć arto .
SFX 2520 N 1
SFX 2520 rzeć artōm .
SFX 2521 N 1
SFX 2521 rzeć artych .
SFX 2522 N 1
SFX 2522 rzeć artyj .
SFX 2523 N 1
SFX 2523 rzeć artymi .
SFX 2524 N 1
SFX 2524 rzeć artymu .
SFX 2525 N 1
SFX 2525 rzeć artym .
SFX 2526 N 1
SFX 2526 rzeć arty .
SFX 2527 N 1
SFX 2527 rzeć ar .
SFX 2528 N 1
SFX 2528 ć ocie .
SFX 2529 N 1
SFX 2529 ć osz .
SFX 2530 N 1
SFX 2530 ć o .
