src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.dic
przekraś/1976,1977,1978,2296,2297,2298,2299,2300,2301,2302,2303,2304,2305,2306,2307,2308,2309,2310,2311,2312,2313,2314,2315,2316,2317,2318,2319,2320,2321,2322,2323,2324,2325,2326,2327,2328,2329,2330,2331,2332
prziwstać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,2485,34,35,36,37,38,1502,1503,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,2486,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,2487,2488,2489
rozrobić/452,279,280,281,282,283,284,285,286,453,465,466,467,468,469,470,471,472,473,474,287,288,289,290,291,292,293,294,295,296,297,298,299,300,301,302,303,304,305,306,307,308,309,310,475,476,477,478,479,480,481,482,483,484,485,2366,2367,2368
spowiedzieć/489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,504,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,1114,2347,2348,2349,2350,2351,2352,2353,2354,2355,2356,1127,1128,1129,1130,1131,1132,1133,2357,1134,1135,2358,2359,2360,2361,2362,2363,2364,2365
tōnio/2491,2490
ukraś/1976,1977,1978,2296,2297,2298,2299,2300,2301,2302,2303,2304,2305,2306,2307,2308,2309,2310,2311,2312,2313,2314,2315,2316,2317,2318,2319,2320,2321,2322,2323,2324,2325,2326,2327,2328,2329,2330,2331,2332
urōś/2411,2412,2413,2414,2415,2416,2417,2418,2419,2420,2421,2422,2423,2424,2425,2426,2427,2428,2429,2430,2431,2432,2433,2434,2435,2436,2437,2438,2439,2440,1411
urōść/2369,2370,2371,2372,2373,2374,2375,2376,2377,2378,2379,2380,2381,2382,2383,2384,2385,2386,2387,2388,2389,2390,2391,2392,2393,2394,2395,2396,2397,2398,2399,2400,2401,2402,2403,2404,2405,2406,2407,2408,2409,2410,1460,1461,1462,1501
ustoć/558,790,791,792,2492,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,793,794,795,796,797,25,26,798,799,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,1892,1893,803,804,805,806,807,808,809,1894,810,811,1895,1896,1897,1898,1899,1900,1901,2493,2494,812
wpłynōńć/176,177,178,179,183,184,185,186,187,188,189,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,205,206,207,208,209,210,1136,1137,1138,1139,1140,1141,1142,1143,1144,1145,1146,1147,1148,1149,1150,1151,1152,1153,1154,1155,1156,1157,211,2344,2345,2346
wsiednōńć/2445,2446,2447,2448,2449,2450,2451,2452,2453,2454,2455,2456,2457,2458,2459,154,155,156,157,158,159,160,176,177,178,179,180,181,182,183,184,185,186,187,188,189,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,210,2460,211,2461,2462,2463,2464,2465,5543,2466
wybrzyże/430,431,432,433,434,2444,435,436
wysłać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,2467,2468,2469,2470,2471,2472,2473,2474,2475
zapedzieć/2333,489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,1101,1102,1103,504,1104,1105,1106,1107,1108,1109,1110,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,2334,1114,2335,1127,1128,1129,1130,1131,1132,1133,1134,1135,2336,2337,2338,2339,2340,2341,2342,2343
zapowiedzieć/489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,504,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,1114,2347,2348,2349,2350,2351,2352,2353,2354,2355,2356,1127,1128,1129,1130,1131,1132,1133,2357,1134,1135,2358,2359,2360,2361,2362,2363,2364,2365
zarwać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,1078,1079,1080,1081,2441,2442,2443,1082,1094,54,55,56,57,58,59,60
zryedzieć/2333,489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,1101,1102,1103,504,1104,1105,1106,1107,1108,1109,1110,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,2334,1114,2335,1127,1128,1129,1130,1131,1132,1133,1134,1135,2336,2337,2338,2339,2340,2341,2342,2343
ôdrobić/452,279,280,281,282,283,284,285,286,453,465,466,467,468,469,470,471,472,473,474,287,288,289,290,291,292,293,294,295,296,297,298,299,300,301,302,303,304,305,306,307,308,309,310,475,476,477,478,479,480,481,482,483,484,485,2366,2367,2368
ôdspać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,2476,2477,2478,2479,2480,2481,2482,2483,2484
